Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.290

Obtaining and allocating federal or private funding.

The state board and the department shall collaborate to obtain any federal or private funding that may become available to implement the state board's duties under this chapter. If the department receives such funding, the department shall allocate it to the state board to implement its duties under this chapter, and any state general funds that may have been appropriated but are no longer needed by the state board shall lapse to the state general fund.

[ 2006 c 239 s 6.]